Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB112.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 150.170 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in the following subsections of this section, and subject to
administrative regulations promulgated under this chapter, no person, resident, or
nonresident shall do any act authorized by any kind of license or permit or assist in
any way any person in doing any act provided for in this chapter with respect to
wildlife unless he or she holds the kind of license or permit, resident or nonresident,
that authorizes the act. It shall be the specific purpose of this chapter to prohibit the
taking or pursuing of any wildlife, protected or unprotected, or the fishing in any
stream or body of water whether public or private, without first procuring the
license provided for in KRS 150.175, except to the extent as may be otherwise
provided in this section.
(2) A person under sixteen (16) years of age may, without a sport fishing license, take
fish by angling, or take minnows by the use of a minnow seine, minnow trap, or dip
net.
(3) A person under twelve (12) years of age shall be exempt from being required to
obtain a sport hunting or sport trapping license as required by this chapter.
(4) The resident owner of private land[farmlands] or the resident owner's[his or her]
spouse or dependent children shall, without procuring any sport hunting[ or sport
fishing] licenses, have the right to [take fish or ]hunt during the open season, except
trapping, on the privately owned land[farmlands] of which they are bona fide
owners. Tenants or their dependent children residing upon these privately owned
lands[farmlands] shall have the same privilege.
(5) The bonda fide resident owner of private land shall have the right to take fish
from any lake or pond located on his or her property without procuring a sport
fishing license from the department. The resident landowner may extend the
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 2/4/2025 9:08 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1431
same rights conferred in this subsection relating to fishing in lakes or ponds
located on his or her lands to any person in written or electronic form, specifying
the permissible fishing location of the lake or pond. The resident landowner at
his or her discretion may restrict the permissible fishing dates. The resident
landowner and any person to whom the resident owner has given written or
electronic permission to fish on the resident owner's property shall not be subject
to any limits or restrictions established in this chapter or administrative
regulations promulgated under this chapter for creel, possession, size, or method
of take for the fish in the resident landowner's lake or pond. Except for
restrictions on the stocking of invasive fish, the resident landowner shall not be
subject to any state requirements regarding the stocking of lakes or ponds located
on the resident landowner's property.
(6) Residents or nonresidents observing and participating in field trials, training
exercises, or other competitions as authorized by the department may observe and
participate without obtaining a hunting or guide's license so long as game is not
taken.
(7)[(6)] Any resident serviceman on furlough of more than three (3) days in this state
may, without any Kentucky sport hunting or sport fishing licenses, do any act
authorized by the licenses, but while so doing he or she shall carry on his or her
person proper identification and papers showing his or her furlough status.
(8)[(7)] Landowners, their spouses or dependent children, or their designee who must
be approved by the commissioner, who kill or trap on their lands any wildlife
causing damage to the lands or any personal property situated thereon shall not be
required to have a hunting or trapping license and may do so during periods other
than the open season for the particular species without a tag and dispose of the
carcass on-site. Tenants, their spouses, their dependent children, or other persons
approved by the commissioner, shall also have the same privilege. Upon destruction
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 2/4/2025 9:08 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1431
of any wildlife by the above-specified individuals, the act shall be reported to a
game warden within twenty-four (24) hours of the kill. Individuals wishing to
transport the carcass from the property upon which it was killed shall contact
personnel of the department to request a disposal tag or other authorization.
Inedible parts from wildlife taken under the authorization of this section shall not be
utilized for any purpose and shall be destroyed or left afield. The department shall
promulgate administrative regulations establishing procedures for the designee
appointment process, including request and approval deadlines.
(9)[(8)] If a reciprocal agreement is entered into by the commissioner, with the
approval of the commission, and promulgated as an administrative regulation by the
department and similar action is taken by the appropriate authority in Missouri,
Tennessee, Virginia, West Virginia, Indiana, Ohio, or Illinois, persons holding a
resident or nonresident fishing or a resident or nonresident hunting license issued in
these states shall be permitted to perform the acts authorized by the license upon
certain contiguous waters and land areas adjacent to the common boundaries of the
above-mentioned states and the State of Kentucky. A resident of the State of
Kentucky shall purchase a proper Kentucky license to conform with the reciprocal
agreement.
(10)[(9)] Any member of the Kentucky Army or Air National Guard, active duty or
Reserve Component, in any branch in the United States Armed Forces that is based
in the Commonwealth of Kentucky, shall have the right to take fish or hunt on any
military property belonging to the Commonwealth without procuring any sport
hunting or sport fishing license.
(11)[(10)] A person not otherwise exempted from hunter safety education or from
procuring any sport hunting or sport fishing license shall be exempt from the
department-sanctioned live-fire exercise component of the hunter education course
requirement if he or she:
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 2/4/2025 9:08 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1431
(a) Is a current member of the Armed Forces of the United States;
(b) Has served in the Armed Forces of the United States and was discharged or
released therefrom under conditions other than dishonorable; or
(c) Is a peace officer certified pursuant to KRS 15.380 to 15.404.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 2/4/2025 9:08 AM Jacketed